Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201858-801
Act, how cited.

Sections 58-801 to 58-866 shall be known and may be cited
as the Nebraska Educational,
Health, and Social Services Finance Authority Act.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2902;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1701;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 1.